Utah statutes.
11-14-318.   Public hearing required.
(1)  Before issuing bonds authorized under this chapter, a local political
subdivision shall:
(a)  in accordance with Subsection (2), provide public notice of the local
political subdivision's intent to issue bonds; and
(b)  hold a public hearing:
(i)  if an election is required under this chapter:
(A)  no sooner than 30 days before the day on which the notice of election is
published under Section 11-14-202; and
(B)  no later than five business days before the day on which the notice of
election is published under Section 11-14-202; and
(ii)  to receive input from the public with respect to:
(A)  the issuance of the bonds; and
(B)  the potential economic impact that the improvement, facility, or property
for which the bonds pay all or part of the cost will have on the private
sector.
(2)  A local political subdivision shall:
(a)  publish the notice required by Subsection (1)(a):
(i) once each week for two consecutive weeks in the official newspaper
described in Section 11-14-316 with the first publication being not less than
14 days before the public hearing required by Subsection (1)(b); and
(ii)  on the Utah Public Notice Website, created under Section 63F-1-701, no
less than 14 days before the public hearing required by Subsection (1)(b); and
(b)  ensure that the notice:
(i)  identifies:
(A)  the purpose for the issuance of the bonds;
(B)  the maximum principal amount of the bonds to be issued;
(C)  the taxes, if any, proposed to be pledged for repayment of the bonds; and
(D)  the time, place, and location of the public hearing; and
(ii)  informs the public that the public hearing will be held for the purposes
described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii).
